Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.12.190

Powers of council.

The council of any code city organized under the mayor-council plan of government provided in this chapter shall have the powers and authority granted to the legislative bodies of cities governed by this title, as more particularly described in chapter 35A.11 RCW.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.12.190.]